Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 3. Officers and Enlisted Men Generally

§ 19-2-301.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-9-301

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-2-302.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-9-302

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-2-303.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

19-9-303

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-2-304.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-9-304

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.